Utah statutes.
11-7-3.   Privileges and immunities from liability extend to departments fighting fires outside territorial limits under contract.

All the privileges and immunities from liability which surround the activities of any county or municipal corporation fire-fighting force or fire department when performing its functions within the governmental unit's territorial limits shall apply to the activities of that governmental unit's fire-fighting force or department while furnishing fire protection outside its territorial limits under any contract pursuant to Section 11-7-1.

